Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.311

Prohibited employment practices.

(1) A licensed escrow agent may not directly or indirectly employ a person who will be handling escrow transactions who has been convicted of, or pled guilty or nolo contrendre to, a felony or a gross misdemeanor involving dishonesty within the last seven years.

(2) A licensed escrow agent may not directly or indirectly employ a person who receives money for trust accounts, disburses funds, or acts as a signatory on trust accounts if the person has shown a disregard in the management of his or her financial condition in the last three years.

(3) The director may adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2010 c 34 s 4.]